Colorado statutes. TITLE 42 VEHICLES AND TRAFFIC
PART 17 PENALTIES AND PROCEDURE
42-4-1704. Offenses by persons controlling vehicles.

It is unlawful for the owner or any other person employing or otherwise directing the driver of any vehicle to require or knowingly to permit the operation of such vehicle upon a highway in any manner contrary to law. Any person who violates any provision of this section commits a class 2 misdemeanor traffic offense.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2418, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-1503 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-4-1704 was relocated to § 43-5-504.

Cross references:

For penalties for class 2 misdemeanor traffic offenses, see § 42-4-1701 (3)(a)(II).

42-4-1705. Person arrested to be taken before the proper court.

Whenever a person is arrested for any violation of this article punishable as a misdemeanor, the arrested person shall be taken without unnecessary delay before a county judge who has jurisdiction of such offense as provided by law, in any of the following cases:

When a person arrested demands an appearance without unnecessary delay before a judge;

When the person is arrested and charged with an offense under this article causing or contributing to an accident resulting in injury or death to any person;

When the person is arrested and charged with DUI, DUI per se, or UDD;

When the person is arrested upon a charge of failure to stop in the event of an accident causing death, personal injuries, or damage to property;

In any other event when the provisions of section 42-4-1701 (5)(b) and (5)(c) apply and the person arrested refuses to give a written promise to appear in court as provided in section 42-4-1707.

Whenever any person is arrested by a police officer for any violation of this article punishable as a misdemeanor and is not required to be taken before a county judge as provided in subsection (1) of this section, the arrested person shall, in the discretion of the officer, either be given a written notice or summons to appear in court as provided in section 42-4-1707 or be taken without unnecessary delay before a county judge who has jurisdiction of such offense when the arrested person does not furnish satisfactory evidence of identity or when the officer has reasonable and probable grounds to believe the person will disregard a written promise to appear in court. The court shall provide a bail bond schedule and available personnel to accept adequate security for such bail bonds.

(2.5) In any case in which the arrested person that is taken before a county judge pursuant to subsection (1) or (2) of this section is a child, as defined in section 19-1-103 (18), C.R.S., the provisions of section 42-4-1706 (2) shall apply.

Any other provision of law to the contrary notwithstanding, a police officer may place a person who has been arrested and charged with DUI, DUI per se, or UDD and who has been given a written notice or summons to appear in court as provided in section 42-4-1707 in a state-approved treatment facility for alcohol use disorders even though entry or other record of such arrest and charge has been made. Placement is governed by article 81 of title 27, except where in conflict with this section.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2418, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2004:

(2.5) added, p. 1332, § 3, effective July 1, 2005.

L. 2008:

(1)(c) and (3) amended, p. 253, § 22, effective July 1.

L. 2010:

(3) amended, (SB 10-175), ch. 188, p. 809, § 89, effective April 29.

L. 2013:

(1)(c) amended, (HB 13-1325), ch. 331, p. 1887, § 17, effective May 28.

L. 2018:

(3) amended, (SB 18-091), ch. 35, p. 390, § 36, effective August 8.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-1504 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-4-1705 was relocated to § 43-5-505.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 18-091, see section 1 of chapter 35, Session Laws of Colorado 2018.

42-4-1706. Juveniles - convicted - arrested and incarcerated - provisions for confinement.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a child, as defined in section 19-1-103 (18), C.R.S., convicted of a misdemeanor traffic offense under this article, violating the conditions of probation imposed under this article, or found in contempt of court in connection with a violation or alleged violation under this article shall not be confined in a jail, lockup, or other place used for the confinement of adult offenders if the court with jurisdiction is located in a county in which there is a juvenile detention facility operated by or under contract with the department of human services that shall receive and provide care for such child or if the jail is located within forty miles of such facility. The court imposing penalties under this section may confine a child for a determinate period of time in a juvenile detention facility operated by or under contract with the department of human services. If a juvenile detention facility operated by or under contract with the department of human services is not located within the county or within forty miles of the jail, a child may be confined for up to forty-eight hours in a jail pursuant to section 19-2-508 (4), C.R.S.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a child, as defined in section 19-1-103 (18), arrested and incarcerated for an alleged misdemeanor traffic offense pursuant to this article 4, and not released on bond, shall be taken before a county judge who has jurisdiction of such offense within forty-eight hours for fixing of bail and conditions of bond pursuant to section 19-2-508 (4)(e). Such child shall not be confined in a jail, lockup, or other place used for the confinement of adult offenders for longer than seventy-two hours, after which the child may be further detained only in a juvenile detention facility operated by or under contract with the department of human services. In calculating time under this subsection (2), Saturdays, Sundays, and court holidays must be included.

In any case in which a child is taken before a county judge pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (2), the child's parent or legal guardian shall immediately be notified by the court in which the county judge sits. Any person so notified by the court under this paragraph (b) shall comply with the provisions of section 42-4-1716 (4).

Source:

L. 94:

Entire section amended, p. 2720, § 309, effective July 1; entire title amended with relocations, p. 2419, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 96:

(1) amended, p. 1698, § 46, effective January 1, 1997.

L. 98:

(2) amended, p. 830, § 56, effective August 5.

L. 2004:

(2) amended, p. 1333, § 4, effective July 1, 2005.

L. 2019:

(2)(a) amended, (SB 19-108), ch. 294, p. 2730, § 30, effective July 1.

42-4-1707. Summons and complaint or penalty assessment notice for misdemeanors, petty offenses, and misdemeanor traffic offenses - release - registration.

Whenever a person commits a violation of this title punishable as a misdemeanor, petty offense, or misdemeanor traffic offense, other than a violation for which a penalty assessment notice may be issued in accordance with the provisions of section 42-4-1701 (5)(a), and such person is not required by the provisions of section 42-4-1705 to be arrested and taken without unnecessary delay before a county judge, the peace officer may issue and serve upon the defendant a summons and complaint which must contain the name and address of the defendant, the license number of the vehicle involved, if any, the number of the defendant's driver's license, if any, a citation of the statute alleged to have been violated, a brief description of the offense, the date and approximate location thereof, and the date the summons and complaint is served on the defendant; direct the defendant to appear in a specified county court at a specified time and place; and be signed by the peace officer. The summons and complaint submitted to the department of revenue and the county court before which appearance is required, either by paper or electronic submission, must contain the name and address of the defendant, the license of the vehicle involved, if any, and the number of the defendant's driver's license, if any.

A summons and complaint issued and served pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (1) on a minor under the age of eighteen years shall also contain or be accompanied by a document containing an advisement to the minor that the minor's parent or legal guardian, if known, shall be notified by the court from which the summons is issued and be required to appear with the minor at the minor's court hearing or hearings.

If a peace officer issues and serves a summons and complaint to appear in any court upon the defendant as described in subsection (1) of this section, any defect in form in such summons and complaint regarding the name and address of the defendant, the license number of the vehicle involved, if any, the number of the defendant's driver's license, if any, the date and approximate location thereof, and the date the summons and complaint is served on the defendant may be cured by amendment at any time prior to trial or any time before verdict or findings upon an oral motion by the prosecuting attorney after notice to the defendant and an opportunity for a hearing. No such amendment shall be permitted if substantial rights of the defendant are prejudiced. No summons and complaint shall be considered defective so as to be cause for dismissal solely because of a defect in form in such summons and complaint as described in this subsection (2).

Whenever a penalty assessment notice for a misdemeanor, petty offense, or misdemeanor traffic offense is issued pursuant to section 42-4-1701 (5)(a), the penalty assessment notice that shall be served upon the defendant by the peace officer shall contain the name and address of the defendant, the license number of the vehicle involved, if any, the number of the defendant's driver's license, if any, a citation of the statute alleged to have been violated, a brief description of the offense, the date and approximate location thereof, the amount of the penalty prescribed for the offense, the amount of the surcharges thereon pursuant to sections 24-4.1-119 (1)(f), 24-4.2-104 (1), and 24-33.5-415.6, C.R.S., the number of points, if any, prescribed for the offense pursuant to section 42-2-127, and the date the penalty assessment notice is served on the defendant; shall direct the defendant to appear in a specified county court at a specified time and place in the event the penalty and surcharges thereon are not paid; shall be signed by the peace officer; and shall contain a place for the defendant to elect to execute a signed acknowledgment of guilt and an agreement to pay the penalty prescribed and surcharges thereon within twenty days, as well as such other information as may be required by law to constitute the penalty assessment notice to be a summons and complaint, should the prescribed penalty and surcharges thereon not be paid within the time allowed in section 42-4-1701.

A penalty assessment notice issued and served pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (3) on a minor under the age of eighteen years shall also contain or be accompanied by a document containing:

A preprinted declaration stating that the minor's parent or legal guardian has reviewed the contents of the penalty assessment notice with the minor;

Preprinted signature lines following the declaration on which the reviewing person described in subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (a.5) shall affix his or her signature and for a notary public to duly acknowledge the reviewing person's signature; and

An advisement to the minor that:

The minor shall, within seventy-two hours after service of the penalty assessment notice, inform his or her parent or legal guardian that the minor has received a penalty assessment notice;

The parent or legal guardian of the minor is required by law to review and sign the penalty assessment notice and to have his or her signature duly acknowledged by a notary public; and

Noncompliance with the requirement set forth in sub-subparagraph (B) of this subparagraph (III) shall result in the minor and the parent or legal guardian of the minor being required to appear in court pursuant to sections 42-4-1710 (1)(b), 42-4-1710 (1.5), and 42-4-1716 (4).

One copy of said penalty assessment notice shall be served upon the defendant by the peace officer and one copy sent to the supervisor within the department and such other copies sent as may be required by rule of the department to govern the internal administration of this article between the department and the Colorado state patrol.

The time specified in the summons portion of said summons and complaint must be at least twenty days after the date such summons and complaint is served, unless the defendant shall demand an earlier court appearance date.

The time specified in the summons portion of said penalty assessment notice shall be at least thirty days but not more than ninety days after the date such penalty assessment notice is served, unless the defendant shall demand an earlier court appearance date.

The place specified in the summons portion of said summons and complaint or of the penalty assessment notice must be a county court within the county in which the offense is alleged to have been committed.

If the defendant is otherwise eligible to be issued a summons and complaint or a penalty assessment notice for a violation of this title punishable as a misdemeanor, petty offense, or misdemeanor traffic offense and if the defendant does not possess a valid Colorado driver's license, the defendant, in order to secure release, as provided in this section, must either consent to be taken by the officer to the nearest mailbox and to mail the amount of the penalty and surcharges thereon to the department or must execute a promise to appear in court on the penalty assessment notice or on the summons and complaint. If the defendant does possess a valid Colorado driver's license, the defendant shall not be required to execute a promise to appear on the penalty assessment notice or on the summons and complaint. The peace officer shall not require any person who is eligible to be issued a summons and complaint or a penalty assessment notice for a violation of this title to produce or divulge such person's social security number.

Any officer violating any of the provisions of this section is guilty of misconduct in office and shall be subject to removal from office.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2420, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2000:

(3)(b) amended, p. 1645, § 32, effective June 1.

L. 2001:

(6) amended, p. 942, § 10, effective July 1.

L. 2004:

(1) amended and (3)(a.5) added, pp. 1333, 1334, §§ 5, 6, effective July 1, 2005.

L. 2007:

(3)(a) amended, p. 1121, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 2009:

(3)(a) and (6) amended, (SB 09-241), ch. 295, p. 1579, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2016:

(1)(a) amended, (HB 16-1032), ch. 37, p. 93, § 1, effective August 10.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-1505 as it existed prior to 1994.

42-4-1708. Traffic infractions - proper court for hearing, burden of proof - appeal - collateral attack.

Every hearing in county court for the adjudication of a traffic infraction, as provided by this article, shall be held before a county court magistrate appointed pursuant to part 5 of article 6 of title 13, C.R.S., or before a county judge acting as a magistrate; except that, whenever a crime and a class A or class B traffic infraction or a crime and both such class A and class B traffic infractions are charged in the same summons and complaint, all charges shall be made returnable before a judge or magistrate having jurisdiction over the crime and the rules of criminal procedure shall apply. Nothing in this part 17 or in part 5 of article 6 of title 13, C.R.S., shall be construed to prevent a court having jurisdiction over a criminal charge relating to traffic law violations from lawfully entering a judgment on a case dealing with a class A or class B traffic infraction.

When a court of competent jurisdiction determines that a person charged with a class 1 or class 2 misdemeanor traffic offense is guilty of a lesser-included offense which is a class A or class B traffic infraction, the court may enter a judgment as to such lesser charge.

The burden of proof shall be upon the people, and the traffic magistrate shall enter judgment in favor of the defendant unless the people prove the liability of the defendant beyond a reasonable doubt. The district attorney or the district attorney's deputy may, in the district attorney's discretion, enter traffic infraction cases for the purpose of attempting a negotiated plea or a stipulation to deferred prosecution or deferred judgment and sentence but shall not be required to so enter by any person, court, or law, nor shall the district attorney represent the state at hearings conducted by a magistrate or a county judge acting as a magistrate on class A or class B traffic infraction matters. The magistrate or county judge acting as a magistrate shall be permitted to call and question any witness and shall also act as the fact finder at hearings on traffic infraction matters.

Appeal from final judgment on a traffic infraction matter shall be taken to the district court for the county in which the magistrate or judge acting as magistrate is located.

Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection (5), no person against whom a judgment has been entered for a traffic infraction as defined in section 42-4-1701 (3)(a) shall collaterally attack the validity of that judgment unless such attack is commenced within six months after the date of entry of the judgment.

In recognition of the difficulties attending the litigation of stale claims and the potential for frustrating various statutory provisions directed at repeat offenders, former offenders, and habitual offenders, the only exceptions to the time limitations specified in subsection (5)(a) of this section are:

A case in which the court entering judgment did not have jurisdiction over the subject matter of the alleged infraction;

A case in which the court entering judgment did not have jurisdiction over the person of the violator;

Where the court hearing the collateral attack finds by a preponderance of the evidence that the failure to seek relief within the applicable time period was caused by an adjudication of incompetence or by commitment or certification of the violator to an institution for treatment as a person with a mental health disorder; or

Where the court hearing the collateral attack finds that the failure to seek relief within the applicable time period was the result of circumstances amounting to justifiable excuse or excusable neglect.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2421, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2006:

(5)(b)(III) amended, p. 1409, § 81, effective August 7.

L. 2017:

IP(5)(b) and (5)(b)(III) amended, (SB 17-242), ch. 263, p. 1381, § 308, effective May 25.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-1505.3 as it existed prior to 1994.

Cross references:

For provisions concerning limitation for collateral attack upon trial judgment, see § 16-5-402; for penalties for class A and class B traffic infractions and class 1 and class 2 misdemeanor traffic offenses, see § 42-4-1701 (3)(a).

42-4-1709. Penalty assessment notice for traffic infractions - violations of provisions by officer - driver's license.

Whenever a penalty assessment notice for a traffic infraction is issued pursuant to section 42-4-1701 (5)(a), the penalty assessment notice that shall be served upon the defendant by the peace officer shall contain the name and address of the defendant, the license number of the vehicle involved, if any, the number of the defendant's driver's license, if any, a citation of the statute alleged to have been violated, a brief description of the traffic infraction, the date and approximate location thereof, the amount of the penalty prescribed for the traffic infraction, the amount of the surcharges thereon pursuant to sections 24-4.1-119 (1)(f), 24-4.2-104 (1), and 24-33.5-415.6, C.R.S., the number of points, if any, prescribed for the traffic infraction pursuant to section 42-2-127, and the date the penalty assessment notice is served on the defendant; shall direct the defendant to appear in a specified county court at a specified time and place in the event the penalty and surcharges thereon are not paid; shall be signed by the peace officer; and shall contain a place for the defendant to elect to execute a signed acknowledgment of liability and an agreement to pay the penalty prescribed and surcharges thereon within twenty days, as well as such other information as may be required by law to constitute the penalty assessment notice to be a summons and complaint, should the prescribed penalty and surcharges thereon not be paid within the time allowed in section 42-4-1701.

(1.5) A penalty assessment notice issued and served pursuant to subsection (1) of this section on a minor under the age of eighteen years shall also contain or be accompanied by a document containing:

A preprinted declaration stating that the minor's parent or legal guardian has reviewed the contents of the penalty assessment notice with the minor;

Preprinted signature lines following the declaration on which the reviewing person described in paragraph (a) of this subsection (1.5) shall affix his or her signature and for a notary public to duly acknowledge the reviewing person's signature; and

An advisement to the minor that:

The minor shall, within seventy-two hours after service of the penalty assessment notice, inform his or her parent or legal guardian that the minor has received a penalty assessment notice;

The parent or legal guardian of the minor is required by law to review and sign the penalty assessment notice and to have his or her signature duly acknowledged by a notary public; and

Noncompliance with the requirement set forth in subparagraph (II) of this paragraph (c) shall result in the minor and the parent or legal guardian of the minor being required to appear in court pursuant to sections 42-4-1710 (1)(b), 42-4-1710 (1.5), and 42-4-1716 (4).

An outstanding judgment entered against such person by a municipal court for a violation of any municipal ordinance which occurred when such person was under eighteen years of age, excluding traffic infractions defined by state statute or ordinance and violations related to parking;

A bench warrant issued against such person by a municipal court for failure to appear to answer a summons or summons and complaint for an alleged violation of any municipal ordinance that occurred when such person was under eighteen years of age, excluding traffic infractions defined by state statute or ordinance and violations relating to parking;

Issued a check or order to the department to pay a penalty assessment, a driver's license fee, a license reinstatement fee, or a motor vehicle record fee and such check or order is returned for insufficient funds or a closed account and remains unpaid. For the purposes of this subparagraph (VI), the term "insufficient funds" means having an insufficient balance on account with a bank or other drawee for the payment of a check or order when the check or order is presented for payment within thirty days after issue.

Repealed.

An outstanding judgment entered against such person by a county or municipal court for a violation of section 42-4-1416.

One copy of said penalty assessment notice shall be served upon the defendant by the peace officer and one copy sent to the supervisor within the department and such other copies sent as may be required by rule of the department to govern the internal administration of this article between the department and the Colorado state patrol.

The time specified in the summons portion of said penalty assessment notice must be at least thirty days but not more than ninety days after the date such penalty assessment notice is served, unless the defendant shall demand an earlier hearing.

The place specified in the summons portion of said penalty assessment notice must be a county court within the county in which the traffic infraction is alleged to have been committed.

Whenever the defendant refuses to accept service of the penalty assessment notice, tender of such notice by the peace officer to the defendant shall constitute service thereof upon the defendant.

Any officer violating any of the provisions of this section is guilty of misconduct in office and shall be subject to removal from office.

A person shall not be allowed or permitted to obtain or renew a permanent driver's, minor driver's, or probationary license if such person has, at the time of making application for obtaining or renewing such driver's license:

(I) An outstanding judgment entered against such person on and after January 1, 1983, pursuant to section 42-4-1710 (2) or (3);

(II) An outstanding judgment entered against such person by a county or municipal court for a violation of a statute or ordinance relating to the regulation of motor vehicles or traffic, excluding traffic infractions defined by state statute or ordinance and violations relating to parking;

(III) A bench warrant issued against such person by a county or municipal court for failure to appear to answer a citation for an alleged violation of a statute or ordinance relating to the regulation of motor vehicles or traffic, excluding traffic infractions defined by state statute or ordinance and violations relating to parking;

The restrictions in paragraph (a) of this subsection (7) shall not apply in cases where an appeal from any determination of liability and penalty is pending and not disposed of at the time of such application for obtaining or renewing a driver's license.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2423, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 95:

(7)(a) amended, p. 1004, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 96:

IP(7)(a) amended, p. 1205, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 97:

(7)(a)(VI) added, p. 1386, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2000:

(2) amended, p. 1645, § 33, effective June 1; IP(7)(a) amended, p. 1359, § 39, effective July 1, 2001.

L. 2003:

(7)(a)(VII) added, p. 1388, § 1, effective August 6.

L. 2004:

(1.5) added, p. 1334, § 7, effective July 1, 2005.

L. 2005:

(7)(a)(VII) repealed, p. 838, § 3, June 1.

L. 2007:

(1) amended, p. 1121, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2009:

(1) amended, (SB 09-241), ch. 295, p. 1580, § 8, effective July 1.

L. 2012:

IP(7)(a) amended and (7)(a)(VIII) added, (SB 12-044), ch. 274, p. 1448, § 3, effective June 8.

42-4-1710. Failure to pay penalty for traffic infractions - failure of parent or guardian to sign penalty assessment notice - procedures.

Unless a person who has been cited for a traffic infraction pays the penalty assessment as provided in this article and surcharge thereon pursuant to sections 24-4.1-119 (1)(f) and 24-4.2-104 (1), C.R.S., the person shall appear at a hearing on the date and time specified in the citation and answer the complaint against such person.

Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraph (a) of this subsection (1) and section 42-4-1701 (5), a minor under the age of eighteen years shall be required to appear at a hearing on the date and time specified in the citation and answer the complaint if the penalty assessment was timely paid but not signed and notarized in the manner required by section 42-4-1707 (3)(a.5) or 42-4-1709 (1.5).

(1.5) If a minor under the age of eighteen years is required to appear at a hearing pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, the minor shall so inform his or her parent or legal guardian, and the parent or legal guardian shall also be required to appear at the hearing.

If the violator answers that he or she is guilty or if the violator fails to appear for the hearing, judgment shall be entered against the violator.

If the violator denies the allegations in the complaint, a final hearing on the complaint shall be held subject to the provisions regarding a speedy trial which are contained in section 18-1-405, C.R.S. If the violator is found guilty or liable at such final hearing or if the violator fails to appear for a final hearing, judgment shall be entered against the violator.

If judgment is entered against a violator, the violator shall be assessed an appropriate penalty and surcharge thereon, a docket fee of sixteen dollars, and other applicable costs authorized by section 13-16-122 (1), C.R.S. If the violator had been cited by a penalty assessment notice, the penalty shall be assessed pursuant to section 42-4-1701 (4)(a). If a penalty assessment notice is prohibited by section 42-4-1701 (5)(c), the penalty shall be assessed pursuant to section 42-4-1701 (3)(a).

On and after July 1, 2008, all docket fees collected under this subparagraph (I) shall be transmitted to the state treasurer for deposit in the judicial stabilization cash fund created in section 13-32-101 (6), C.R.S.

Pursuant to section 13-1-204 (1)(b), C.R.S., a five-dollar surcharge, in addition to the original surcharge described in paragraph (a) of this subsection (4), shall be assessed and collected on each docket fee that is described in paragraph (a) of this subsection (4) concerning penalties assessed on and after July 1, 2007.

In no event shall a bench warrant be issued for the arrest of any person who fails to appear for a hearing pursuant to subsection (1.5) or (2) of this section or for a final hearing pursuant to subsection (3) of this section. Except as otherwise provided in section 42-4-1716, entry of judgment and assessment of the penalty and surcharge pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (4) and any penalties imposed pursuant to section 42-2-127 shall constitute the sole penalties for failure to appear for either the hearing or the final hearing.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2424, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 98:

(4) amended, p. 1433, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

(4)(a) amended, p. 2671, § 2, effective June 6.

L. 2004:

(1) and (4)(b) amended and (1.5) added, p. 1335, § 8, effective July 1, 2005.

L. 2007:

(4)(a.5) added, p. 1269, § 8, effective May 25; (4)(a)(I) amended, p. 1539, § 33, effective May 31; (1)(a) amended, p. 1122, § 8, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

(4)(a)(I)(B) amended, p. 2148, § 26, effective June 4.

L. 2017:

(4)(a)(II) amended, (HB 17-1303), ch. 331, p. 1780, § 5, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-1505.7 as it existed prior to 1994.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2008 act amending subsection (4)(a)(I)(B), see section 1 of chapter 417, Session Laws of Colorado 2008.

42-4-1711. Compliance with promise to appear.

A written promise to appear in court may be complied with by an appearance by counsel.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2425, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-1506 at is existed prior to 1994.

42-4-1712. Procedure prescribed not exclusive.

The foregoing provisions of this article shall govern all police officers in making arrests without a warrant or issuing citations for violations of this article, for offenses or infractions committed in their presence, but the procedure prescribed in this article shall not otherwise be exclusive of any other method prescribed by law for the arrest and prosecution of a person for an offense or infraction of like grade.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2425, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-1507 as it existed prior to 1994.

Cross references:

For arrests generally, see article 3 of title 16.

42-4-1713. Conviction record inadmissible in civil action.

Except as provided in sections 42-2-201 to 42-2-208, no record of the conviction of any person for any violation of this article shall be admissible as evidence in any court in any civil action.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2425, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-1508 as it existed prior to 1994.

42-4-1714. Traffic violation not to affect credibility of witness.

The conviction of a person upon a charge of violating any provision of this article or other traffic regulation less than a felony shall not affect or impair the credibility of such person as a witness in any civil or criminal proceeding.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2425, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-1509 as it existed prior to 1994.

42-4-1715. Convictions, judgments, and charges recorded - public inspection.

Every judge of a court not of record and every clerk of a court of record shall keep a full record of every case in which a person is charged with any violation of this article or any other law regulating the operation of vehicles on highways.

Upon application by a person, the court shall expunge all records concerning a conviction of the person for UDD with a BAC of at least 0.02 but not more than 0.05 if:

Such person presents a request for expungement to the court and provides all information required by the court to process such request;

Such person is over twenty-one years of age and the court action regarding the offense has been concluded;

The person has not been convicted for any other offense under section 42-4-1301 that was committed while such person was under twenty-one years of age;

Such person pays the fine and surcharge for such conviction and completes any other requirements of the court with regard to such conviction, including, but not limited to, any order to pay restitution to any party;

Such person has never held a commercial driver's license as defined in section 42-2-402; and

Such person was not operating a commercial motor vehicle as defined in section 42-2-402.

Upon receiving a request for expungement, the court may delay consideration of such request until sufficient time has elapsed to ensure that the person is not convicted for any additional offense of DUI, DUI per se, DWAI, or UDD committed while the person was under twenty-one years of age.

Subject to paragraph (b) of this subsection (2), within ten days after the entry of a judgment, conviction, or forfeiture of bail of a person upon a charge of violating this article or other law regulating the operation of vehicles on highways, the judge or clerk of the court in which the entry of a judgment was made, the conviction was had, or bail was forfeited shall prepare and forward to the department an abstract of the record of the court covering every case in which the person had a judgment entered against him or her, was convicted, or forfeited bail, which abstract shall be certified by the preparer to be true and correct.

For the holder of a commercial driver's license as defined in section 42-2-402 or an offense committed by a person operating a commercial motor vehicle as defined in section 42-2-402, within five days after conviction of a person upon a charge of violating this article or other law regulating the operation of vehicles on highways, the judge or clerk of the court in which the person was convicted shall prepare and forward to the department an abstract of the record of the court covering every case in which the person was convicted, which abstract shall be certified by the preparer to be true and correct.

Said abstract must be made upon a form furnished by the department and shall include the name, address, and driver's license number of the party charged, the registration number of the vehicle involved, the nature of the offense, the date of hearing, the plea, the judgment or whether bail forfeited, and the amount of the fine or forfeiture.

Every court of record shall also forward a like report to the department:

Upon the conviction of any person of vehicular homicide or any other felony in the commission of which a vehicle was used; and

Upon the dismissal of a charge for DUI, DUI per se, DWAI, or UDD or if the original charge was for DUI, DUI per se, DWAI, or UDD and the conviction was for a nonalcohol- or nondrug-related traffic offense.

(Deleted by amendment,

L. 2008, p. 475

, § 6, effective July 1, 2008.)

The department shall keep all abstracts received under this section, as well as a record of penalty assessments received, at the main office, and the same shall be public records and subject to the provisions of section 42-1-206.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2425, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 97:

(1) amended, p. 1469, § 15, effective July 1.

L. 98:

IP(1)(b)(I) amended, p. 176, § 7, effective April 6.

L. 2008:

IP(1)(b)(I), (1)(b)(II), and (4)(a)(II) amended, p. 253, § 23, effective July 1; (1)(b)(I)(E) and (1)(b)(I)(F) added and (2) and (4)(b) amended, pp. 474, 475, §§ 5, 6, effective July 1.

L. 2013:

(1)(b)(II) and (4)(a)(II) amended, (HB 13-1325), ch. 331, p. 1887, § 18, effective May 28.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-1510 as it existed prior to 1994.

Cross references:

For vehicular homicide, see § 18-3-106.